Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1504
Offenses other than forgery; instruments; how described.

In all cases other than those mentioned in section 29-1503, whenever it shall be necessary to make any averment in any indictment as to any instrument, whether the same consists wholly or in part of writing, print or figures, it shall be sufficient to describe such instrument by any name or designation by which the same may be usually known, or by the purport thereof.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 416, p. 817;

R.S.1913, § 9053;

C.S.1922, § 10077;

C.S.1929, § 29-1504;

R.S.1943, § 29-1504.